Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.20, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Revenue calculation. (a) General education revenue must be paid to a charter school as though it were a district. The general education revenue for each adjusted pupil unit is the state average general education revenue per pupil unit, plus the referendum equalization aid allowance and first tier local optional aid allowance in the pupil's district of residence, minus an amount equal to the product of the formula allowance according to section 126C.10, subdivision 2, times .0466, calculated without declining enrollment revenue, local optional revenue, basic skills revenue, extended time revenue, pension adjustment revenue, transition revenue, and transportation sparsity revenue, plus declining enrollment revenue, basic skills revenue, pension adjustment revenue, and transition revenue as though the school were a school district. (b) For a charter school operating an extended day, extended week, or summer program, the general education revenue in paragraph (a) is increased by an amount equal to 25 percent of the statewide average extended time revenue per adjusted pupil unit. new text begin (c) Local optional revenue aid for a charter school equals the total sum of a district's local optional revenue as determined under section 126C.10, subdivision 2e, times the school's adjusted pupil units for the school year. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the general education revenue for an eligible special education charter school as defined in section 124E.21, subdivision 2, equals the sum of the amount determined under paragraph (a) and the school's unreimbursed cost as defined in section 124E.21, subdivision 2, for educating students not eligible for special education services.